Hawaii, session 2025, SB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purchase of a parcel of land identified as tax map key:  (1) 9-1-013-025, including any existing improvements thereon. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the Act 279 special fund established by Act 125, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase of a parcel of land identified as tax map key: (1) 9‑1-013-025, including any existing improvements thereon. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.